Missouri, session 2026, SB1627.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 400.4-403, RSMo, is repealed and one
new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section
400.4-403, to read as follows:
400.4-403. (a) A customer or any person authorized to
draw on the account if there is more than one person may
stop payment of any item drawn on the customer's account or
close the account by an order to the bank describing the
item or account with reasonable certainty received at a time
and in a manner that affords the bank a reasonable
opportunity to act on it before any action by the bank with
respect to the item described in section 400.4-303. If the
signature of more than one person is required to draw on an
account, any of these persons may stop payment or close the
account.
(b) A stop-payment order is effective [for six months]
unless canceled by a person authorized to draw on the
account, but it lapses after fourteen calendar days if the
original order was oral and was not confirmed in writing
within that period. [A stop-payment order may be renewed
for additional six-month periods by a writing given to the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1627 2
bank within a period during which the stop-payment order is
effective.]
(c) The burden of establishing the fact and amount of
loss resulting from the payment of an item contrary to a
stop-payment order or order to close an account is on the
customer. The loss from payment of an item contrary to a
stop-payment order may include damages for dishonor of
subsequent items under Section 400.4-402.
✓